Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-691
Moving traffic offense; conviction; court may require course of instruction.

When a person has been convicted in any court in this state of any moving traffic offense, the court may, in addition to the penalty provided by law for such offense and as a part of the judgment of conviction or as a condition of probation, require such person, at his or her expense if any, to attend and satisfactorily complete a course of instruction at a driver improvement school, if such school exists, located and operating within the county of such person's residence or within the jurisdiction of such court. Such school shall be designated by the court in its order and shall provide instruction in the recognition of hazardous traffic situations and prevention of traffic accidents.

Laws 1969, c. 509, § 2, p. 2088;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-427.01;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 39-6,114.01;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 187.